Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,107
Commissioner; expenses.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his or her services but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in connection with the discharge of his or her duties on the same basis as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 36.